Missouri, session 2026, SB1145.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.1754, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 67.1754,
to read as follows:
67.1754. 1. The sales tax authorized in sections
67.1712 to 67.1721 shall be collected and allocated as
follows:
(1) Fifty percent of the sales taxes collected from
each county shall be deposited in the metropolitan park and
recreational fund to be administered by the board of
directors of the district to pay costs associated with the
establishment, administration, operation and maintenance of
public recreational facilities, parks, and public
recreational grounds associated with the district. Costs
for office administration beginning in the second fiscal
year of district operations may be up to but shall not
exceed fifteen percent of the amount deposited pursuant to
this subdivision;
(2) Fifty percent of the sales taxes collected from
each county shall be returned to the source county for park
purposes, which may include storm water management projects

SB 1145 2
in such county that are confined to acquiring land for the
sole purpose of building a park or greenway or for the
deployment and augmentation of natural infrastructure or
features that would otherwise add to or not take away from
the benefits of the park to the community, except that forty
percent of such fifty percent amount shall be reserved for
distribution to municipalities within the county in the form
of grant revenue-sharing funds. Each county in the district
shall establish its own process for awarding the grant
proceeds to its municipalities for park purposes provided
the purposes of such grants are consistent with the purpose
of the district. In the case of a county of the first
classification with a charter form of government having a
population of at least nine hundred thousand inhabitants,
such grant proceeds shall be awarded to municipalities by a
municipal grant commission as described in section 67.1757;
in such county, notwithstanding other provisions to the
contrary, the grant proceeds may be used to fund any
recreation program or park improvement serving municipal
residents and for such other purposes as set forth in
section 67.1757.
2. The sales tax authorized under subsection 2 of
section 67.1712 shall be collected and allocated as follows:
(1) Sixty percent of the sales taxes collected from
all counties shall be deposited in a separate metropolitan
park and recreational fund to be administered by the board
of directors of the metropolitan district to pay costs
associated with the administration, operation, and
maintenance of public recreational facilities, parks, and
public recreational grounds associated with the metropolitan
district. Of this amount:

SB 1145 3
(a) For a period ending twenty years after the
issuance of any bonds issued for the purpose of improving
and maintaining the Gateway Arch grounds, but no later than
twenty-three years after the effective date of the
incremental sales tax as approved by voter initiative under
subsection 2 of section 67.1715:
a. Fifty percent shall be apportioned to
accessibility, safety, improvement, and maintenance of the
Gateway Arch grounds; and
b. Fifty percent shall be apportioned to
accessibility, safety, improvement, and maintenance of park
projects other than the Gateway Arch grounds;
(b) After the period described in paragraph (a) of
this subdivision:
a. Twenty percent shall be apportioned to
accessibility, safety, improvement, and maintenance of the
Gateway Arch grounds; and
b. Eighty percent shall be apportioned to
accessibility, safety, improvement, and maintenance of park
projects other than the Gateway Arch grounds;
(c) Costs for office administration beginning in the
second fiscal year of collection and allocation may be up to
but shall not exceed fifteen percent of the amount deposited
under this subdivision;
(2) Forty percent of the sales taxes collected from
each county shall be returned to the source county for park
purposes, except that forty percent of the amount allocated
to each source county shall be reserved for distribution to
municipalities within the county in the form of grant-
sharing funds. Each county in the metropolitan district
shall establish its own process for awarding the grant
proceeds to its municipalities for park purposes, provided

SB 1145 4
the purposes of such grants are consistent with the purpose
of the metropolitan district. In the case of any county
with a charter form of government and with more than nine
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, such grant proceeds
shall be awarded to municipalities by a municipal grant
commission as described in section 67.1757, and in such
county, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, such grant proceeds may be used to fund any
recreation program or park improvement serving municipal
residents and for such other purposes as set forth in
section 67.1757.
3. At a general election occurring not less than six
months before the expiration of twenty years after issuance
of any bonds issued for the purpose of improving and
maintaining the Gateway Arch grounds, but no later than
twenty-three years after the effective date of the
incremental sales tax as approved by voter initiative under
subsection 2 of section 67.1715, the governing body of any
county within the metropolitan district whose voters
100 approved such incremental tax shall submit to its voters a
101 proposal to reauthorize such tax after the expiration of
102 such period. The form of the question shall be determined
103 by the metropolitan district. Such reauthorization shall
104 become effective only after a majority of the voters of each
105 such county who vote on such reauthorization approve the
106 reauthorization.
✓